Washington statutes.
RCW 27.15.040

Authority to construct, acquire, maintain, and remodel facilities—Interlocal agreements—Legal title.

A library capital facilities [facility] area may construct, acquire, maintain, and remodel library capital facilities and the governing body of the library capital facility area may, by interlocal agreement or otherwise, contract with a county, city, town, or library district to design, administer the construction of, operate, or maintain a library capital facility financed pursuant to this chapter. Legal title to library capital facilities acquired or constructed pursuant to this chapter may be transferred, acquired, or held by the library capital facility area or by a county, city, town, or library district in which the facility is located.

[ 1995 c 368 s 5.]